Hawaii, session 2026, HB2081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-235.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§286-235.5  Persons exempt from licensure.  (a) The following persons shall be exempt from licensure under this part: (1)  Individuals who operate commercial motor vehicles for military purposes.  This exception is limited to active-duty military personnel, members of the military reserves, members of the national guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time national guard duty, personnel on part-time national guard training, and national guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms), and active-duty United States Coast Guard personnel.  This exception is not applicable to United States reserve technicians; and (2)  Federal, state, and county firefighters, and law enforcement officers who drive federal, state, or county fire trucks, including fire pumpers, aerial ladder trucks, and elevated platform trucks, or authorized emergency vehicles; provided that they are trained by the federal, state, or county government and the commercial motor vehicles are equipped with audible and visual signals and are not subject to normal traffic regulation.  For purposes of this paragraph, "authorized emergency vehicle" shall have the same meaning as in section 291C-1. (b)  State and county firefighters exempt from licensure under this part shall be subject to an alcohol and substance abuse policy for employees that is equivalent to, or exceeds the provisions of, the safety and health standards established by the United States Department of Transportation for holders of commercial driver's licenses." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request